test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-xosjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: хонаханда”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: хонахананда”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: хонахаданда”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: хонавнанда”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl2: хонахаюда”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl2: хонахаюда”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl2: хонахаюта”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: хонида”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: хонида”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: хонита”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: хонахата”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: хонаха”ната”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [хонахатата”, хонахатта”]
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: хони”маната”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: хонадо’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: хонамдо’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: хонандо’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: хонахандо’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: хонаханандо’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: хонахадандо’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: хонавнандо’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl3: хонахаюдо’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl3: хонахаюдо’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl3: хонахаюто’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: хонидо’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: хонидо’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: хонито’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: хонахато’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: хонаха”нато’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [хонахатато’, хонахатто’]
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: хони”манато’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Abs: хонад
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [хонадав, хонадув, хонадами]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: хонадами
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [хонадав, хонадув, хонадами]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: хонадами
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [хонадан, хонадани]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: хонадани
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: хонадар
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: хонадамд
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: хонаданд
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: хонадада
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: хонадамда
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: хонаданда
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: хонадами’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: хонадами’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: хонадани’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: хонадари’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: хонадамди’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: хонаданди’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: хонадади’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: хонадамди’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: хонаданди’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: хонадава”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: хонадава”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: хонадана”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: хонадара”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: хонадамда”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: хонаданда”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: хонададо’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: хонадамдо’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: хонадандо’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg1: хонадм’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg2: хонан
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg3: хона
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu1: хонани’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu2: хонади’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu3: хонаха’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl1: хонава”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl2: хонада”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl3: хона”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg1: хонадамзь
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg2: хонанась
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg3: хонась
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu1: хонанинзь
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu2: хонадинзь
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu3: хонаханзь
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl1: хонаваць
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl2: хонадаць
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl3: хонаць
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg1: хонав
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg2: хонар
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg3: хонада
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu1: хонами’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu2: хонари’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu3: хонади’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl1: хонава”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl2: хонара”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl3: хонадо’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg1: хонавась
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg2: хонарась
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg3: хонадась
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu1: хонаминзь
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu2: хонаринзь
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu3: хонадинзь
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl1: хонаваць
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl2: хонараць
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl3: хонадонзь
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg1: хонахаюн
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg2: хонахаюд
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg3: хонахаюда
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu1: хонахаюни’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu2: хонахаюди’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu3: хонахаюди’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl1: хонахаюна”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl2: хонахаюда”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl3: хонахаюдо’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg1: хонахаюнась
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg2: хонахаюдась
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg3: хонахаюдась
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu1: хонахаюнинзь
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu2: хонахаюдинзь
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu3: хонахаюдинзь
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl1: хонахаюнаць
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl2: хонахаюдаць
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl3: хонахаюдонзь
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg1: хонин
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg2: хонид
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg3: хонида
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu1: хонини’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu2: хониди’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu3: хониди’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl1: хонина”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl2: хонида”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl3: хонидо’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg1: хонинась
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg2: хонидась
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg3: хонидась
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu1: хонининзь
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu2: хонидинзь
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu3: хонидинзь
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl1: хонинаць
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl2: хонидаць
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl3: хонидонзь
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Tra: хонаӈэ
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Car: хонаси”
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Equ: хонадарем’
     хось+V+TV+PrcImprf+Equ+Lat: хонадарев’
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+Abs: ховы
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+Abs: ховым’
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+Abs: ховы’
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+Abs: ховэн’
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+Abs: ховэхэна
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+Abs: ховэхэд
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+Abs: ховэвна
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+Abs: ховэхэ’
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+Abs: ховэхэ’
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+Abs: ховэхэ’
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+Abs: ховы”
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+Abs: ховы
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+Abs: ховы”
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+Abs: ховэхэ”
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+Abs: ховэхэ”на
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+Abs: ховэхэт
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+Abs: ховы”мана
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [ховэв, ховэми]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: ховэми
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [ховэв, ховэми]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: ховэми
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [ховэн, ховэни]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: ховэни
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [ховэхэн, ховэхэни]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: ховэхэни
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [ховэхэнан, ховэхэнани]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: ховэхэнани
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [ховэхэдан, ховэхэдани, ховэхэдни]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: [ховэхэдани, ховэхэдни]
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [ховэвнан, ховэвнани]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: ховэвнани
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [ховэхэюн, ховэхэюни]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: ховэхэюни
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [ховэхэюн, ховэхэюни]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: ховэхэюни
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [ховэхэюн, ховэхэюни]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: ховэхэюни
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [ховын, ховыни]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: ховыни
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [ховын, ховыни]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: ховыни
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [ховы”н, ховы”ни]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: ховы”ни
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [ховэхэ”н, ховэхэ”ни]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: ховэхэ”ни
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [ховэхэ”нан, ховэхэ”нани]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: ховэхэ”нани
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [ховэхэтан, ховэхэтани, ховэхэтни]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: [ховэхэтани, ховэхэтни]
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [ховы”манан, ховы”манани]
#     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: ховы”манани
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ховэр
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: ховэмд
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ховэнд
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: ховэхэнд
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ховэхэнанд
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: ховэхэданд
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: ховэвнанд
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxSg2: ховэхэюд
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxSg2: ховэхэюд
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxSg2: ховэхэют
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ховыд
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: ховыд
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: ховыт
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: ховэхэт
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: ховэхэ”нат
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: ховэхэтат
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: ховы”манат
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ховэда
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: ховэмда
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ховэнда
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ховэхэнда
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: ховэхэнанда
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: ховэхэданда
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: ховэвнанда
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxSg3: ховэхэюда
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxSg3: ховэхэюда
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxSg3: ховэхэюта
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ховыда
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: ховыда
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ховыта
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: ховэхэта
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: ховэхэ”ната
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [ховэхэтата, ховэхэтта]
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: ховы”маната
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: ховэми’
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: ховэми’
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ховэни’
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: ховэхэни’
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: ховэхэнани’
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [ховэхэдани’, ховэхэдни’]
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: ховэвнани’
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxDu1: ховэхэюни’
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxDu1: ховэхэюни’
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxDu1: ховэхэюни’
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: ховыни’
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: ховыни’
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: ховы”ни’
     хось+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: ховэхэ”ни’
